Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1309.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. US Army SSGT James D. Rushton Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds that:(1) James Delmont Rushton was born December 24, 1932, in Dixonville, Indiana County.(2) He became Staff Sergeant in the United States Army and was assigned to the 1st Battalion, 72nd Armor Regiment, then known as the 72nd Heavy Tank Battalion.(3) Staff Sergeant Rushton was discharged in February 1955.(4) Staff Sergeant Rushton was awarded the Good Conduct Medal, National Defense Service Medal, United Nations Medal and Korean Service Medal.(5) Staff Sergeant Rushton passed away July 3, 2010.12345678910111213141516171819 (b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 19237, carrying State Route 1018, over a tributary of Dixon Run in Green Township, Indiana County, is designated as the US Army SSGT James D. Rushton Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1309PN1663 - 2 - 123456789